Tennessee, session 114, HB2170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2003(7), is amended by
deleting "files an annual report" and substituting "files an annual report, which may be filed
electronically,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2170
012042
- 1 -